src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 р-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 р-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдимки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдим-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдим-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдимда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдикки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдик-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдик-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдикда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдинг-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдинг-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингиз-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингиз-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдинглар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдинглар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингларда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизларда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдингизлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рди-ю [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рди-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдида [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдиларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдилар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдилар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдиларда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маски [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 мас-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 мас-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 мас-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдимки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдим-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдим-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдимда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдикки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдик-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдик-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдикда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдинг-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдинг-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингиз-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингиз-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдинглар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдинглар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингларда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизлар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизлар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизларда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдингизлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масди-ю [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масди-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдида [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдиларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдилар-у [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдилар-ов [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдиларда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмики [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидимки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидикки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидингки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидингизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидингларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидингизлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидингизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидики [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмидиларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмики [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидим [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидимки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидик [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидикки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидинг [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидингки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидингиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидингизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидинглар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидингларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидингизлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидингизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмиди [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидики [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидилар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмидиларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмиканки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмиканманки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмиканмизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмикансанки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмикансизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмикансанлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмикансанларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмикансизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рмиканларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмиканки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмиканманки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмиканмизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмикансанки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмикансизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмикансанлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмикансанларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмикансизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масмиканларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирманки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирмизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирсанки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирсизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирсанлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирсанларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирсизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 рдирларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирманки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирмизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирсанки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирсизки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирсанлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирсанларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирсизларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 масдирларки [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 й-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 ймикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 й-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йим [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йим-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йиммикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йим-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йинг [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йинг-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йинг-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йингиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йи [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йими [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йидир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йи-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йидир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йи-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиган [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдигандир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиган-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдигандир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиган-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганим [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганим-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганиммикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганим-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганинг [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганинг-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганинг-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганингиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдигани [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганими [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганидир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдигани-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганидир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдигани-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлар [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлардир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлар-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлардир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлармикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлар-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларим [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларим-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганлариммикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларим-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимиз [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимизми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимиздир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимиз-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимиздир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимизмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларимиз-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларинг [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 йдиганларингми [аеёиоуўэюя]
