src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
аварчалаштир/X
ағдар/X
аёнлаш/X
азизлаш/X
айирбошлан/X
айни/X
айҳайла/X
акцептла/X
алаҳсира/X
алиштир/X
амаллат/X
андавалаш/X
апшур/X
арзонла/X
арт/X
асқот/X
асфальтлан/X
ахборотлаштир/X
аччиғлан/X
бадавлатлаш/X
бажарт/X
баланслан/X
баркамоллаш/X
басталаш/X
бачкилат/X
безангла/X
безовталан/X
белаш/X
бераҳмлаш/X
бетартиблан/X
беҳоллан/X
бижғи/X
биқтирил/X
билинтирил/X
бирлаштир/X
бичил/X
бодирла/X
болала/X
боравер/X
ботин/X
бошқартир/X
бўғдирил/X
буғриқ/X
бўзла/X
бўкала/X
бўл/X
булғаш/X
буран/X
буриш/X
бўронлан/X
бутат/X
бўшантир/X
бўялтир/X
важвужла/X
валақла/X
варилла/X
вершокла/X
висирла/X
волдираш/X
газлан/X
гандираклат/X
гарантияла/X
гидрогенла/X
гипслат/X
гувра/X
гумонлан/X
гуриллаш/X
гутгутла/X
ғамлан/X
ғидинглаш/X
ғилдират/X
ғирилла/X
ғовурлат/X
ғужмай/X
ғурурлантир/X
дазмоллаш/X
дамлан/X
дардлан/X
дастурлаш/X
декретла/X
диверсификацияла/X
дилдира/X
дириллат/X
додла/X
дренажлан/X
дукурла/X
дўмбирлат/X
дурагайла/X
еб-ич/X
ёғдиртир/X
ёдлат/X
ёйдир/X
ёқлат/X
еликтир/X
елпиттир/X
ёнбошла/X
ёндирил/X
ёрдиргиз/X
ёруғлаш/X
етказил/X
ечавер/X
жабдуқла/X
жадаллат/X
жамоалаштирил/X
жаҳллан/X
жикиллат/X
жилмайиш/X
жимирлаштир/X
жиркантир/X
жонлантир/X
жўнавор/X
жуфтла/X
замазкалаттир/X
зарарлантир/X
заҳарлаштир/X
зинғилла/X
зичлат/X
зувилла/X
иви/X
изғи/X
изтироблан/X
илак/X
илдизлат/X
илиш/X
имола/X
инғала/X
инжиқла/X
интеграциялаш/X
ирға/X
ирилла/X
исканала/X
истеҳзолан/X
ихтисослаш/X
ичириш/X
ишқаш/X
ишонтирил/X
йиғилиш/X
йилтиллат/X
йирттир/X
йўқот/X
йўндир/X
кавлаш/X
калдират/X
камит/X
каржла/X
катталаштирил/X
кейинлаш/X
келтирил/X
кер/X
кескинлаштир/X
кечиктир/X
кизакла/X
кинолаштирил/X
кирлат/X
кишанла/X
ковакла/X
коксла/X
конденсацияла/X
коррозиялан/X
кристаллаштирил/X
куйдирт/X
кўкартир/X
кулимсира/X
кўмилтир/X
кўпай/X
кўпчитил/X
кўриш/X
кут/X
кучайт/X
қабар/X
қада/X
қадрсизлантирил/X
қайиртир/X
қайсарлаш/X
қақрат/X
қалинлат/X
қамса/X
қапиш/X
қари/X
қасмоқла/X
қаторлаш/X
қашлат/X
қизған/X
қий/X
қийнат/X
қийшанглаш/X
қимирлатиш/X
қирғоқла/X
қиртиллат/X
қиста/X
қичинтир/X
қовурил/X
қоқин/X
қолоқлаш/X
қонсира/X
қорайтир/X
қотирил/X
қувватлантир/X
қувонтирил/X
қуйдир/X
қулайлаш/X
қўлма-қўлла/X
қумалан/X
қўниш/X
қурдиртир/X
қўрқит/X
қуруқша/X
қутқар/X
қўш/X
лаблаштирил/X
лахтала/X
лиққоқлан/X
лойиҳалаштир/X
лоқайдлан/X
мавжлантир/X
мажақла/X
майдалаш/X
мақтаниш/X
маслаҳатлашил/X
машаққатлан/X
маърифатлан/X
механизациялаштирил/X
мижғилан/X
милжингла/X
мингиз/X
мисқолла/X
модернизациялаш/X
мондалан/X
мубоҳасалаш/X
мужассамлантир/X
мукофотлан/X
мулойимлаш/X
мункилла/X
мусаффолан/X
мушкуллаштир/X
найзала/X
намлантир/X
нафислаш/X
немисчала/X
ниқтал/X
нишонлат/X
нокаслаш/X
нўқила/X
нусхалат/X
обор/X
оғирсин/X
оздиртир/X
оқсоқла/X
олтингугуртлаштир/X
орзиқ/X
осонлаш/X
очилтир/X
пайвандла/X
пардалан/X
патакла/X
пийпал/X
писилла/X
пишириш/X
понглаш/X
пўкпўкла/X
равонлаш/X
ранжит/X
ретушлан/X
савалат/X
салқинла/X
санчил/X
саситиш/X
секинлаш/X
серрай/X
сизсира/X
сиқиш/X
симилла/X
сирала/X
ситтир/X
соғломлаштирил/X
сотиш/X
сувоқла/X
сўзлан/X
суқла/X
супур/X
суриштиравер/X
суффикслаш/X
табриклаш/X
такомиллан/X
тақин/X
тамбалат/X
танлаттир/X
тарашлаттир/X
тартибсизлан/X
тахассуслан/X
ташланил/X
тебраниш/X
текиз/X
тепин/X
терсай/X
тизилла/X
тиктиртир/X
тиллаш/X
тинтиш/X
тириқлат/X
тисарил/X
тоблат/X
толғинлаш/X
топтал/X
тошил/X
туғдирил/X
тўзғитил/X
тўйлаш/X
тула/X
туманлаш/X
тўпиллат/X
туркумла/X
тута/X
тухумла/X
увлаш/X
узайт/X
ўзлаштириш/X
уйқусираш/X
ўкириш/X
уқтир/X
улуғлан/X
унаштирил/X
унуттир/X
урғула/X
ўрнатил/X
ўстирил/X
ўтқизиш/X
учиб-қўн/X
учуқлан/X
фаоллаш/X
хабарла/X
хасталан/X
хирала/X
хомакила/X
хулосалаш/X
хушлаш/X
ҳайратлан/X
ҳаракатлан/X
ҳилвират/X
ҳолсизлантир/X
ҳуриш/X
чавоқлан/X
чакичлан/X
чалдир/X
чанди/X
чархлаттир/X
чекичлаш/X
чиғирлат/X
чикчикла/X
чимчи/X
чирмат/X
чопқила/X
чуврат/X
чўкиш/X
чулдура/X
чуҳла/X
шайлан/X
шалтоқлан/X
шартлашиш/X
шиғрайтир/X
шимдир/X
шитирла/X
шонала/X
шувилла/X
эгасизлантир/X
экранлаштир/X
эмиздирил/X
эриштир/X
эшил/X
юғур/X
юм/X
юргизил/X
яккала/X
яллиғлан/X
янграт/X
яроғсизлантирил/X
яшиллантир/X
